Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1021.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9720.9. Sentencing for offenses committed against immigration enforcement.(a) Sentencing enhancement.--In addition to any minimum term of imprisonment authorized or established by law for the offense, the Pennsylvania Commission on Sentencing, in accordance with section 2154 (relating to adoption of guidelines for sentencing), shall provide for a sentence enhancement within its guidelines for:(1) a crime of violence, as defined in section 9714(g) (relating to sentences for second and subsequent offenses), if the offense was knowingly committed for the purpose of 12345678910111213141516171819 interfering with or disrupting enforcement activities or the enforcement of 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12 (relating to immigration and nationality); and(2) a crime of violence, as defined in section 9714(g) or an offense under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 27 (relating to assault), if bodily injury results to a law enforcement officer or an individual authorized to enforce 8 U.S.C. Ch. 12.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "law enforcement officer" shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" is given under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1021PN1186 - 2 - 123456789101112